California, session 20252026, AB2538.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14132.752 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately following Section 14132.75, to read:14132.752. (a) (1) A hospice provider shall use an online form, as developed by the department, to notify the department when a Medi-Cal fee-for-service member elects to receive hospice services. A submission through email or paper format for this notification shall not be accepted.(2) The department may designate the Medi-Cal Hospice Program Attestation Form, its successor, or a different form, for purposes of the online form described in paragraph (1), as determined appropriate by the department.(b) The hospice provider shall submit the online form within five calendar days after the Medi-Cal fee-for-service member’s election to receive hospice services.(c) The hospice provider shall submit the online form in conjunction with counseling the Medi-Cal member, obtaining informed consent, and completing and obtaining a signature on the Medi-Cal Hospice Program Election Notice Form (DHCS 8052) or its successor. The provider shall maintain the election notice form in the Medi-Cal member’s medical records and shall make the election notice form available to the department upon request or in the event of a state or federal audit.(d) (1) Submission of the online form described in subdivision (a) shall be required for reimbursement eligibility, but the submission itself does not guarantee that reimbursement.(2) A claim for reimbursement under this section by a hospice provider shall be processed only after the department validates the information and applies the relevant hospice billing code.(e) A hospice provider is encouraged to retain any email confirmation from the department as proof of timely filing under this section.(f) This section applies only to the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system. In the case of Medi-Cal managed care, a hospice provider shall instead follow its assigned Medi-Cal managed care plan’s submission requirements, including, but not limited to, the submission of a Medi-Cal hospice program election notice as set forth in All Plan Letter 25-008 or its successor.(g) This section shall not limit the department’s authority to implement any additional fraud-prevention measures as authorized or required by state or federal law.